dictsource/hi_rules
.group स
        स          sV
        _L23) स (L21L20_         s        // generated
        _L23) स (L21L20          s        // generated
        _L22L23) स (L21L20_      s        // generated
        _L22L23) स (L21L20       s        // generated
        L23) स (L21L20_          s        // generated
        L23) स (L21L20           s        // generated
        _L22) स (L21्_           s@4      // generated
        _L22) स (L21्            s@4      // generated
        _L22L22) स (L21्_        s@4      // generated
        _L22L22) स (L21्         s@4      // generated
        L22) स (L21्_            s@4      // generated
        L22) स (L21्             s@4      // generated
        _L20) स (L21L22्         s        // generated
        _L22L20) स (L21L22्      s        // generated
        L20) स (L21L22्          s        // generated
        _्) स (L21_              s@4      // generated
        _्) स (L21L22_           s@4      // generated
        _्) स (L21               s@4      // generated
        _L22्) स (L21_           s@4      // generated
        _L22्) स (L21L22_        s@4      // generated
        _L22्) स (L21            s@4      // generated
        ्) स (L21_               s@4      // generated
        ्) स (L21L22_            s@4      // generated
        ्) स (L21                s@4      // generated
        _L22) स (L23_            s@4      // generated
        _L22) स (L23L22_         s@4      // generated
        _L22) स (L23             s@4      // generated
        _L22L22) स (L23_         s@4      // generated
        _L22L22) स (L23L22_      s@4      // generated
        _L22L22) स (L23          s@4      // generated
        L22) स (L23_             s@4      // generated
        L22) स (L23L22_          s@4      // generated
        L22) स (L23              s@4      // generated
        _L21) स (L21L22ड         s        // generated
        _ां) स (L21_             s@4      // generated
        _ां) स (L21L22_          s@4      // generated
        _ां) स (L21              s@4      // generated
        ां) स (L21_              s@4      // generated
        ां) स (L21L22_           s@4      // generated
        ां) स (L21               s@4      // generated
        _L21) स (L21L22्         s        // generated
        _L22L21) स (L21L22्      s        // generated
        L21) स (L21L22्          s        // generated
        _L20) स (L21L23_         s        // generated
        _L20) स (L21L23          s        // generated
        _L22L20) स (L21L23_      s        // generated
        _L22L20) स (L21L23       s        // generated
        L20) स (L21L23_          s        // generated
        L20) स (L21L23           s        // generated
        _L22) स (पL22_           s        // generated
        _L22) स (पL22            s        // generated
        _L21) स (L21L23_         s        // generated
        _L21) स (L21L23          s        // generated
        _L22L21) स (L21L23_      s        // generated
        _L22L21) स (L21L23       s        // generated
        L21) स (L21L23_          s        // generated
        L21) स (L21L23           s        // generated
        _L20) स (L21L22्         s        // generated
        _L22L20) स (L21L22्      s        // generated
        L20) स (L21L22्          s        // generated
        सँ         sV~        // + candrabindu
        स (_       s
        स (B       s

.group ह
        ह          HV
        _L22) ह (L21L20_         H        // generated
        _L22) ह (L21L20          H        // generated
        _L22L22) ह (L21L20_      H        // generated
        _L22L22) ह (L21L20       H        // generated
        L22) ह (L21L20_          H        // generated
        L22) ह (L21L20           H        // generated
        _L23) ह (L21L20_         H        // generated
        _L23) ह (L21L20          H        // generated
        _L22L23) ह (L21L20_      H        // generated
        _L22L23) ह (L21L20       H        // generated
        L23) ह (L21L20_          H        // generated
        L23) ह (L21L20           H        // generated
        _L22) ह (L21्_           H@4      // generated
        _L22) ह (L21्            H@4      // generated
        _L22L22) ह (L21्_        H@4      // generated
        _L22L22) ह (L21्         H@4      // generated
        L22) ह (L21्_            H@4      // generated
        L22) ह (L21्             H@4      // generated
        _L20) ह (L21L22्         H        // generated
        _L22L20) ह (L21L22्      H        // generated
        L20) ह (L21L22्          H        // generated
        _्) ह (L21_              H@4      // generated
        _्) ह (L21L22_           H@4      // generated
        _्) ह (L21               H@4      // generated
        _L22्) ह (L21_           H@4      // generated
        _L22्) ह (L21L22_        H@4      // generated
        _L22्) ह (L21            H@4      // generated
        ्) ह (L21_               H@4      // generated
        ्) ह (L21L22_            H@4      // generated
        ्) ह (L21                H@4      // generated
        _L22) ह (L23_            H@4      // generated
        _L22) ह (L23L22_         H@4      // generated
        _L22) ह (L23             H@4      // generated
        _L22L22) ह (L23_         H@4      // generated
        _L22L22) ह (L23L22_      H@4      // generated
        _L22L22) ह (L23          H@4      // generated
        L22) ह (L23_             H@4      // generated
        L22) ह (L23L22_          H@4      // generated
        L22) ह (L23              H@4      // generated
        _L21) ह (L21L22ड         H        // generated
        _ां) ह (L21_             H@4      // generated
        _ां) ह (L21L22_          H@4      // generated
        _ां) ह (L21              H@4      // generated
        ां) ह (L21_              H@4      // generated
        ां) ह (L21L22_           H@4      // generated
        ां) ह (L21               H@4      // generated
        _L21) ह (L21L22्         H        // generated
        _L22L21) ह (L21L22्      H        // generated
        L21) ह (L21L22्          H        // generated
        _L20) ह (L21L23_         H        // generated
        _L20) ह (L21L23          H        // generated
        _L22L20) ह (L21L23_      H        // generated
        _L22L20) ह (L21L23       H        // generated
        L20) ह (L21L23_          H        // generated
        L20) ह (L21L23           H        // generated
        _L22) ह (पL22_           H        // generated
        _L22) ह (पL22            H        // generated
        _L21) ह (L21L23_         H        // generated
        _L21) ह (L21L23          H        // generated
        _L22L21) ह (L21L23_      H        // generated
        _L22L21) ह (L21L23       H        // generated
        L21) ह (L21L23_          H        // generated
        L21) ह (L21L23           H        // generated
        _L20) ह (L21L22्         H        // generated
        _L22L20) ह (L21L22्      H        // generated
        L20) ह (L21L22्          H        // generated
        हँ         HV~        // + candrabindu
        ह (_       H
        ह (B       H


                        // nukta,  modifies a consonant

.group ऽ                // avagraha, lengthens a vowel ??
        ऽ          :

.group ँ
        ँ          n         // candrabindu, fallback only
     B) ँ                    // after a vowel sign: the sign's own (ँ rule already
                              // nasalized the vowel; an extra n made बाँटे [bãnʈe]

.group ं
        ं          n         // anusvara default

        // Labials -> m
        ं (प       m
        ं (फ       m
        ं (ब       m
        ं (भ       m
        ं (म       m
        ं (फ़       m

        // Retroflex -> n.
        ं (ट       n.
        ं (ठ       n.
        ं (ड       n.
        ं (ढ       n.
        ं (ण       n.
        ं (ड़       n.
        ं (ढ़       n.

        // Palatals -> n^
        ं (च       n^
        ं (छ       n^
        ं (ज       n^
        ं (झ       n^
        ं (ञ       n^
        ं (य       n^
        ं (ज़       n^

        // Velars -> N
        ं (क       N
        ं (ख       N
        ं (ग       N
        ं (घ       N
        ं (ङ       N
        ं (क़       N
        ं (ख़       N
        ं (ग़       N

        // Dentals -> n
        ं (त       n
        ं (थ       n
        ं (द       n
        ं (ध       n
        ं (न       n

        // Sibilants and h -> homorganic nasal
        ं (श       n^
        ं (ष       n.
        ं (ह       N

.group ः
        ः          H         //  visarga

.group ्		// virama
्	H@l'Vnt
C)	् 

// Extra consonants

.group क़   // qa
        क़          qV
        क़ँ         qV~        // + candrabindu
        क़ (_       q
        क़ (B       q

.group ख़   // khha
        ख़          xV
        ख़ँ         xV~        // + candrabindu
        ख़ (_       x
        ख़ (B       x

.group ग़    // ghha
        ग़          QV
        ग़ँ         QV~        // + candrabindu
        ग़ (_       Q
        ग़ (B       Q

.group ज़    // za
        ज़          zV
        ज़ँ         zV~        // + candrabindu
        ज़ (_       z
        ज़ (B       z

.group ड़    // dddha   (should retroflex flap ?)
        ड़          r.V
        ड़ँ         r.V~        // + candrabindu
        ड़ (_       r.
        ड़ (B       r.

.group ढ़    // rha  (aspirated version of dddha)
        ढ़          r.hV
        ढ़ँ         r.hV~        // + candrabindu
        ढ़ (_       r.h
        ढ़ (B       r.h

.group फ़    // fa
        फ़          fV
        फ़ँ         fV~        // + candrabindu
        फ़ (_       f
        फ़ (B       f

.group य़    // yya
        य़          jV
        य़ँ         jV~        // + candrabindu
        य़ (_       j
        य़ (B       j

.group ॠ    // rr
        ॠ          V-rr

.group ॡ    // ll
        ॡ          l-:       // long syllabic l



// If we find a Latin letter a-z, then translate as English
// (This is now done automatically by the eSpeak program)

.group o
        o          _^_EN
   D__) of (__D    me


// symbols
.group
    __) - (_D      m'a:In@s     // "-5" is minus five; the sign was silently dropped
